District of Columbia statutes.
22-2603.04

Detainment power.

Any person who, being lawfully upon the grounds of the penal institution, introduces or attempts to introduce contraband prohibited by § 2-2603.02(a) may be taken into custody by the warden and detained for not more than 2 hours, pending surrender to a police officer with the Metropolitan Police Department.

History

Dec. 15, 1941, 55 Stat. 800, ch. 572, § 1
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 991, ch. 646, § 32(b)
May 24, 1949, 63 Stat. 107, ch. 139, § 127
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 572, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(c)(30)
redesignated § 5, Dec. 10, 2009, D.C. Law 18-88, § 210, 56 DCR 7413

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 22-2603.
1981 Ed., § 22-2603.
1973 Ed., § 22-2603.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 210 of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-181, August 6, 2009, 56 DCR 6903).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 210 of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-227, October 21, 2009, 56 DCR 8668).